Mississippi, session 2026, HB410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The State Board of Education shall develop a civics curriculum to be incorporated into the existing curriculum mandated for all public high schools. The civics curriculum must be designed to provide students with the knowledge and skills that are critical to the responsibilities of citizenship in the constitutional democracy of the United States.  The board shall require each school district to implement the civics curriculum in the 2027-2028 school year. SECTION 2.  Section 37-13-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-151.  * * *Before July 1, 1997, The State Board of Education shall develop a home economics curriculum to be implemented in the public high schools by all local school districts * * * shall provide programs of education in home economics, in Grade 10, 11 or 12, which in the 2026-2027 school year.  The home economics curriculum must include, at a minimum, coursework in responsible parenting and family living skills.  The * * *se programs shall contain curriculum also must provide instruction to prepare students to understand children's physical, mental, emotional and social growth and development as well as to assume responsibility for their care and guidance, with emphasis on nutrition, emotional health and physical health.  * * *All such programs shall be subject to the approval of the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 37‑31‑205(1)(d). SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.